Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1429
Revocation of tobacco license; reissue.

(1) If a license issued under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 is revoked and forfeited as provided in section 28-1425 for a violation of section 28-1429.04 or 28-1429.05, no new license shall be issued to such licensee until the expiration of five years after the date of such revocation and forfeiture.

(2) If a license issued under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 is revoked and forfeited as provided in section 28-1425 for any other violation of sections 28-1418 to 28-1429.03, 28-1429.06, and 28-1429.07, no new license shall be issued to such licensee until the expiration of one year after the date of such revocation and forfeiture except as otherwise provided in section 28-1423.

Laws 1919, c. 180, § 10, p. 403;

C.S.1922, § 9858;

C.S.1929, § 28-1032;

R.S.1943, § 28-1031;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 14.